Utah statutes.
63M-7-401.   Creation -- Members -- Appointment -- Qualifications.
(1)  There is created a state commission to be known as the Sentencing
Commission composed of 27 members.  The commission shall develop by-laws and
rules in compliance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, and elect its officers.
(2)  The commission's members shall be:
(a)  two members of the House of Representatives, appointed by the speaker of
the House and not of the same political party;
(b)  two members of the Senate, appointed by the president of the Senate and
not of the same political party;
(c)  the executive director of the Department of Corrections or a designee
appointed by the executive director;
(d)  the director of the Division of Juvenile Justice Services or a designee
appointed by the director;
(e)  the executive director of the Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice
or a designee appointed by the executive director;
(f)  the chair of the Board of Pardons and Parole or a designee appointed by
the chair;
(g)  the chair of the Youth Parole Authority or a designee appointed by the
chair;
(h)  two trial judges and an appellate judge appointed by the chair of the
Judicial Council;
(i)  two juvenile court judges designated by the chair of the Judicial
Council;
(j)  an attorney in private practice who is a member of the Utah State Bar,
experienced in criminal defense, and appointed by the Utah Bar Commission;
(k)  an attorney who is a member of the Utah State Bar, experienced in the
defense of minors in juvenile court, and appointed by the Utah Bar Commission;
(l)  the director of Salt Lake Legal Defenders or a designee appointed by the
director;
(m)  the attorney general or a designee appointed by the attorney general;
(n)  a criminal prosecutor appointed by the Statewide Association of Public
Attorneys;
(o)  a juvenile court prosecutor appointed by the Statewide Association of
Public Attorneys;
(p)  a representative of the Utah Sheriff's Association appointed by the
governor;
(q)  a chief of police appointed by the governor;
(r)  a licensed professional appointed by the governor who assists in the
rehabilitation of adult offenders;
(s)  a licensed professional appointed by the governor who assists in the
rehabilitation of juvenile offenders;
(t)  two members from the public appointed by the governor who exhibit
sensitivity to the concerns of victims of crime and the ethnic composition of
the population; and
(u)  one member from the public at large appointed by the governor.
